District of Columbia statutes.
11-1917

Coordination and cooperation of courts.

To the extent feasible, the Superior Court and the United States District Court shall consider the respective needs of each court in the qualification, selection, and service of jurors. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent such courts from entering into any agreement for sharing resources and facilities (including automated data processing and hardware and software, forms, postage, and other resources).

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.
1981 Ed., § 11-1917.